District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.202

Eligibility requirements.

(a)

An applicant to be an apprentice refrigeration and air conditioning mechanic shall be registered by the Mayor, without examination, upon providing such information as may be required by the Board of Industrial Trades and payment of appropriate fees. An apprentice refrigeration and air conditioning mechanic shall work only under the direct personal supervision and control of a licensed master mechanic.

(b)

An applicant for licensure as a master mechanic shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Industrial Trades that the applicant has been employed installing, maintaining, repairing and replacing refrigeration and air conditioning equipment systems larger than 25 compressor horsepower or the equivalent tons of refrigeration in the aggregate for a period of at least 5 consecutive years immediately preceding the date of application, as verified in writing by a master mechanic.

(c)

An applicant for licensure as a master mechanic limited shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Industrial Trades that the applicant:

(1)

Has been employed installing, maintaining, repairing and replacing refrigeration and air conditioning equipment systems less than 25 compressor horsepower or the equivalent tons of refrigeration in the aggregate for a period of at least 5 consecutive years immediately preceding the date of application, as verified in writing by a master mechanic, and

(2)

Have proof of chlor fluro carbon certification.

(d)

(1)

The Board shall accept, in lieu of an examination, experience, or other requirements of test or skill established by the Board, a certificate from a national certifying organization certifying that the applicant:

(A)

Has completed the organization’s apprenticeship program;

(B)

Has passed the organization’s required examination;

(C)

Is designated by that organization as a journeyman refrigeration and air conditioning mechanic; and

(D)

Has not been disciplined or otherwise disqualified by the organization.

(2)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “national certifying organization” shall include a nationally recognized trade organization, non-union sponsor, or labor union that is registered with the Bureau of Apprenticeship Training, the United States Department of Labor, or the District of Columbia Apprenticeship Council.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-274, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2055
This section is referenced in § 47-2853.12.
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.202.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-274 added (d).